tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Saç Bakımı > Saç Şekillendirme Aletleri: Taraklar ve Fırçalar; Saç Maşaları; Saç Örgü Makineleri; Saç Kırma Makineleri; Bigudiler; Saç Kurutma Makineleri; Saç Düzleştiriciler; Saç Şekillendirme Araç Setleri
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Hajápolás > Hajformázó eszközök: Fésűk és kefék; Hajsütővasak; Hajfonók; Hajhullámosítók; Hajcsavarók; Hajszárítók; Hajvasalók; Hajformázó eszközkészletek
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Plaukų priežiūra > Plaukų formavimo įrankiai: Šukos ir šepečiai; Garbanojimo žnyplės; Plaukų pynimo įrankiai; Plaukų gofravimo prietaisai; Plaukų suktuvai; Plaukų džiovintuvai; Plaukų tiesintuvai; Plaukų formavimo įrankių rinkiniai
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Pielęgnacja włosów > Narzędzia do stylizacji włosów: Grzebienie i szczotki; Lokówki do włosów; Urządzenia do zaplatania włosów; Karbownice do włosów; Produkty nadające skręt włosom; Suszarki do włosów; Prostownice do włosów; Zestawy urządzeń do stylizacji włosów
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Nega las > Orodja za oblikovanje las: Glavniki in krtače; Kodralniki; Naprave za pletenje las; Valovniki; Navijalke za lase; Sušilniki za lase; Likalniki za lase; Kompleti orodij za oblikovanje las
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 모발 관리 > 헤어 스타일링 도구: 빗/브러시; 고데기; 헤어 브레이더; 헤어 크림퍼; 헤어 롤러; 헤어 드라이어; 헤어 스트레이트너; 헤어 스타일링 도구 세트
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado capilar > Útiles de peluquería: Peines y cepillos; Tenacillas; Trenzadoras de cabello; Onduladores de crimpado; Rulos; Secadores; Planchas de pelo; Artículos para el pelo
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลผม > เครื่องมือจัดแต่งผม: หวีและแปรง; ที่หนีบผม; เครื่องถักเปียผม; เครื่องดัดผมลอนแบบหยัก; ที่ม้วนผม; ที่เป่าผม; เครื่องหนีบผม; ชุดเครื่องมือตกแต่งทรงผม
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soin des cheveux > Outils de coiffure: Peignes et brosses; Fers à friser; Appareils à tresser; Fers à gaufrer; Bigoudis; Sèche-cheveux; Fers à lisser; Ensembles d’accessoires de coiffure
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Haarkosmetik > Haarstyling-Geräte: Kämme & Bürsten; Lockenstäbe; Haarflechtgeräte; Kreppeisen; Lockenwickler; Haartrockner; Haarglätter; Hairstyling-Sets
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o vlasy > Nástroje na úpravu vlasov: Hrebene a kefy; Kulmy; Zaplétacie strojčeky na vlasy; Krepovače vlasov; Kulmy na vlasy; Sušiče vlasov; Žehličky na vlasy; Súpravy nástrojov na úpravu vlasov
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Hiustenhoito > Hiusten muotoiluvälineet: Kammat ja harjat; Kihartimet; Hiuspunoja; Hiusten aaltorauta; Hiustenkihartimet; Hiustenkuivaajat; Suoristusraudat; Hiusten muotoilulaitesetit
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Περιποίηση μαλλιών > Εργαλεία styling μαλλιών: Χτένες & βούρτσες; Σίδερα για μπούκλες; Πλεκτικές μαλλιών; Ψαλίδια crimping μαλλιών; Συσκευές για κατσάρωμα των μαλλιών; Στεγνωτήρες μαλλιών; Ισιωτικά μαλλιών; Σετ εργαλείων styling μαλλιών
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijirea părului > Instrumente de coafat: Piepteni și perii; Ondulatoare; Aparate de împletit părul; Aparate de ondulat părul; Bigudiuri; Uscătoare de păr; Plăci pentru îndreptarea părului; Seturi de instrumente de coafat
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Hårpleje > Redskaber til hårstyling: Kamme og børster; Krøllejern; Hårflettemaskiner; Hårkrøllejern; Hårcurlere; Hårtørrere; Glattejern; Hårstylingsapparatsæt
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 头发护理 > 头发造型工具: 发梳/发刷; 卷发棒; 编发器; 玉米烫夹板; 卷发夹/筒/球/器; 吹风机; 直发器; 头发造型工具套装
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados com os cabelos > Utensílios de penteado: Pentes e escovas; Pranchas modeladoras; Trançadores de cabelo; Modeladores de ondas; Bobes; Secadores de cabelo; Chapinhas; Conjuntos de aparelhos para modelagem dos cabelos
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 頭髮保養 > 髮型工具: 梳子和髮刷; 捲髮棒; 編髮器; 髮型棒; 捲髮器; 吹風機; 直髮器; 美髮工具組
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc tóc > Dụng cụ làm tóc: Lược và bàn chải; Dây uốn tóc; Dụng cụ tết tóc; Máy tạo gợn sóng tóc; Dụng cụ uốn tóc; Máy sấy tóc; Máy ép, duỗi tóc; Bộ công cụ tạo mẫu tóc
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Haarverzorging > Haarstylingsapparaten: Kammen en borstels; Krultangen; Haar vlechters; Haar crimpers; Haarkrullers; Föhns; Stijltangen; Sets met haarstylingapparaten
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado do cabelo > Equipamento para pentear o cabelo: Pentes e escovas; Ferros de enrolar o cabelo; Máquinas de tranças; Onduladores de cabelo; Dispositivos para enrolar o cabelo; Secadores do cabelo; Alisadores de cabelo; Conjuntos de dispositivos para pentear o cabelo
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Грижа за косата > Инструменти за оформяне на коса: Гребени и четки; Маши за къдрене; Инструменти за сплитане на коса; Преси за вълни за коса; Ролки за коса; Сешоари за коса; Преса за коса; Комплекти инструменти за оформяне на коса
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > ヘアケア用品 > ヘアスタイリング道具: くし・ブラシ; カールアイロン; ヘアブレイダー; ヘアクリンパー; ヘアカーラー; ヘアドライヤー; ストレートアイロン; ヘアスタイリング用品セット
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o vlasy > Nástroje pro vlasový styling: Hřebeny a kartáče; Kulmy; Pletače vlasů; Krepovačky na vlasy; Natáčky na vlasy; Fény; Žehličky na vlasy; Sady přístrojů pro péči o vlasy
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за волосами > Инструменты для укладки волос: Расчески и щетки; Плойки для завивки; Устройства для плетения кос; Щипцы-гофре для волос; Бигуди; Фены для волос; Выпрямители-утюжки; Наборы инструментов для укладки
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cura dei capelli > Utensili per parrucchieri: Pettini e spazzole; Arricciacapelli; Intreccia capelli; Ondulatori per capelli; Bigodini; Asciugacapelli; Stiracapelli; Set di strumenti di parruccheria
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Hårpleie > Hårstylingsverktøy: Kammer og børster; Hårtenger; Hårflettere; Kreppetenger; Krølltenger; Hårtørkere; Rettetenger; Verktøysett for hårstyling
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Hair Care > Hair Styling Tools: Combs & Brushes; Curling Irons; Hair Braiders; Hair Crimpers; Hair Curlers; Hair Dryers; Hair Straighteners; Hair Styling Tool Sets
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Hårvård > Frisörredskap: Kammar och borstar; Locktänger; Hårflätare; Hårcrimpers; Hårspolar; Hårtorkar; Plattänger; Hårstylingsverktyg
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega kose > Alati za oblikovanje kose: Češljevi i četke; Figaro; Alati za pletenice; Alati za valovitu kosu; Uvijači za kosu; Sušila za kosu; Pegle za kosu; Kompleti alata za oblikovanje kose